Utah statutes.
58-77-302.   Qualifications for licensure.

Each applicant for licensure as a licensed Direct-entry midwife shall:

(1)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(2)  pay a fee as determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(3)  be of good moral character;

(4)  hold a Certified Professional Midwife certificate in good standing with the North American Registry of Midwives or equivalent certification approved by the division in collaboration with the board;

(5)  hold current adult and infant CPR and newborn resuscitation certifications through an organization approved by the division in collaboration with the board; and

(6)  provide documentation of successful completion of an approved pharmacology course as defined by division rule.



Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

